Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-162 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For purposes of this section:
1. "Assigned sex at birth" means a set of either XX or XY
chromosomes biologically present when a person was born, which shall
be proven by the gender documented in a person's valid birth
certificate;
2. "Public school" means all free schools supported by public
taxation and shall include nurseries, kindergartens, elementary,
which may include either K-6 or K-8, secondary schools, technology
Req. No. 10433 Page 1

cent er schools that have minor children attending, and such other
school classes and instruction as may be supported by public
taxation that have minor children attending; and
3. "School personnel" means a faculty member of a public
school, teacher of a public school, employee of a public school, or
employee of a public school partner such as a contractor, volunteer,
and nonprofit employee. This section only applies to personnel
acting within the scope of his or her duties for a public school.
B. School personnel shall not:
1. Ask a student to address them by a pronoun or alternate name
that is inconsistent with the school personnel's biological sex
without written permission from the student's parent or legal
guardian;
2. Ask a student what his or her preferred pronoun or alternate
name is without written permission from the student's parent or
guardian; and
3. Refer to a student by a pronoun or alternate name that is
inconsistent with the student's assigned sex at birth without
written permission from the student's parent or legal guardian.
C. A public school student shall not:
1. Ask school personnel to refer to the student using a pronoun
or alternate name that is inconsistent with the student's assigned
sex at birth without written permission from the student's parent or
legal guardian;
Req. No. 10433 Page 2

2. Ask school personnel what his or her preferred pronoun or
alternate name is without written permission from the student's
parent or guardian; and
3. Refer to school personnel by a pronoun or alternate name
that is inconsistent with the school personnel's assigned sex at
birth without written permission from the student's parent or legal
guardian.
D. This section shall not apply to school personnel and
students with genetically verifiable disorders of sex development,
including but not limited to, aneuploidy, XX or XY sex reversal
syndromes, and ovotesticular disorder.
E. If any school personnel learns of any violation of this
section, he or she shall inform a school administrator immediately.
Once informed, school administrators shall notify the parents or
legal guardians of all students involved with said violation within
twenty-four (24) hours, and shall include a detailed description of
the violation with such notification.
F. School personnel found to have violated this section may be
subject to disciplinary action, including but not limited to,
teacher license suspension or revocation, contract cancellation, or
termination of employment or partnership.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
Req. No. 10433 Page 3

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10433 SW 01/14/25




















Req. No. 10433 Page 4